Utah statutes.
9-11-104.   Navajo Revitalization Fund.

(1) (a)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund called the "Navajo Revitalization Fund."

(b)  The revitalization fund shall consist of:

(i)  money deposited to the revitalization fund under this chapter;

(ii)  money deposited to the revitalization fund under Section 59-5-119; and

(iii)  any loan repayment or interest on a loan issued under this chapter.

(2) (a)  The revitalization fund shall earn interest.

(b)  The interest earned on revitalization fund money shall be deposited into the fund.

(3)  Beginning for fiscal year 2010-11, the division may use revitalization fund money for the administration of the revitalization fund, but this amount may not exceed 4% of the annual receipts to the revitalization fund.

